West Virginia, session 2025, HB2111.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 17B. Uniform Mortgage Modification Act §31-17B-1. Title. This article may be cited as the Uniform Mortgage Modification Act. §31-17B-2. Definitions. In this article:(1) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities;(2) "Financial covenant" means an undertaking to demonstrate an obligor’s creditworthiness or the adequacy of security provided by an obligor;(3) "Modification" includes change, amendment, revision, correction, addition, supplementation, elimination, waiver, and restatement;(4) "Mortgage":(A) Means an agreement that creates a consensual interest in real property to secure payment or performance of an obligation, regardless of:(i) How the agreement is denominated, including a mortgage, deed of trust, trust deed, security deed, indenture, and deed to secure debt; and (ii) Whether the agreement also creates a security interest in personal property; and(B) Does not include an agreement that creates a consensual interest to secure a liability owed by a unit owner to a condominium association, owners’ association, or cooperative housing association for association dues, fees, or assessments;(5) "Mortgage modification" means modification of: (A) A mortgage;(B) An agreement that creates an obligation, including a promissory note, loan agreement, or credit agreement; or (C) An agreement that creates other security or credit enhancement for an obligation, including an assignment of leases or rents or a guaranty;(6) "Obligation" means a debt, duty, or other liability, secured by a mortgage;(7) "Obligor" means a person that:(A) Owes payment or performance of an obligation;(B) Signs a mortgage; or(C) Is otherwise accountable, or whose property serves as collateral, for payment or performance of an obligation;(8) "Person" means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity;(9) "Recognized index" means an index to which changes in the interest rate may be linked that is:(A) Readily available to, and verifiable by, the obligor; and  (B) Beyond the control of the person to whom the obligation is owed;(10) "Record", used as a noun, means information:(A) Inscribed on a tangible medium; or(B) Stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in perceivable form.(11) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:(A) Execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or(B) Attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process. §31-17B-3. Scope. (a) Except as provided in §31-17B-3 (c), this article applies to a mortgage modification.(b) This article does not affect:(1) Law governing the required content of a mortgage; (2) A statute of limitations or other law governing the expiration or termination of a right to enforce an obligation or a mortgage;(3) A recording statute;(4) A statute governing the priority of a tax lien or other governmental lien; (5) A statute of frauds or electronic transactions pursuant to §39A-1-1 et seq.; or(6) Except as provided in §31-1B-4 4(b)(8), law governing the priority of a future advance. (c) This article does not apply to any of the following modifications:(1) A release of, or addition to, property encumbered by a mortgage;(2) A release of, addition of, or other change in an obligor; or(3) An assignment or other transfer of a mortgage or an obligation. §31-17B-4. Effect of Mortgage Modification. (a) For a mortgage modification described in §31-17B-4 (b): (1) The mortgage continues to secure the obligation as modified;(2) The priority of the mortgage is not affected by the modification; (3) The mortgage retains its priority regardless of whether a record of the mortgage modification is recorded in the county clerk’s office pursuant to §7-1-3; and(4) The modification is not a novation.(b) Subsection (a) applies to one or more of the following mortgage modifications: (1) An extension of the maturity date of an obligation; (2) A decrease in the interest rate of an obligation;(3) If the change does not result in an increase in the interest rate of an obligation as calculated on the date the modification becomes effective:(A) A change to a different index that is a recognized index if the previous index to which changes in the interest rate were linked is no longer available;(B) A change in the differential between the index and the interest rate;(C) A change from a floating or adjustable rate to a fixed rate; or(D) A change from a fixed rate to a floating or adjustable rate based on a recognized index;(4) A capitalization of unpaid interest or other unpaid monetary obligation;(5) A forgiveness, forbearance, or other reduction of principal, accrued interest, or other monetary obligation; (6) A modification of a requirement for maintaining an escrow or reserve account for payment of an obligation, including taxes and insurance premiums; (7) A modification of a requirement for acquiring or maintaining insurance; (8) A modification of an existing condition to advance funds;(9) A modification of a financial covenant; and(10) A modification of the payment amount or schedule resulting from another modification described in this subsection.(c) The effect of a mortgage modification not described in subsection (b) is governed by other law. §31-17B-5. Uniformity of Application and Construction. In applying and construing this uniform act, a court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the law among jurisdictions that enact it. §31-17B-6. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act. This article modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b). §31-17B-7. Transitional Provision. This article applies to a mortgage modification made on or after the effective date of this act regardless of when the mortgage or the obligation was created.